North Carolina, session 2025, SB635.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 3A.
"Healthy Families and Healthy Workplaces Act.
"§ 95-31.1. Short title and legislative purpose.
(a) This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthy Families and Healthy
Workplaces Act."
(b) The public policy of this State is declared as follows: The health and safety needs of
employees and their families and the protection of employees from losing their jobs and pay
while they seek medical care for themselves, and their family members, are subjects of concern
requiring legislation to promote the general welfare of the people of the State without
jeopardizing the competitive position of North Carolina business and industry. The General
Assembly declares that the general welfare of the State requires the enactment of this law under
the police power of the State.
"§ 95-31.2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Child. – A biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, legal ward, or child
of a parent standing in loco parentis.
(2) Domestic violence. – As defined in G.S. 50B-1.
(3) Employ. – As defined by G.S. 95-25.2(3).
(4) Employee. – As defined by G.S. 95-25.2(4).
(5) Employer. – As defined by G.S. 95-25.2(5).
(6) Health care provider. – Any of the following:
a. A doctor of medicine or osteopathy licensed to practice medicine
under federal law, any state law, or the laws of another country
wherein the person practices.
b. A physician assistant licensed in this State licensed to practice under
federal law, any state law, or the laws of another country wherein the
person practices.
c. A family nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife licensed to
practice under federal law, any state law, or the laws of another
country wherein the person practices.
(7) Immediate family member. – A child, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic
partner, civil union partner, parent, or grandparent of an employee, or a
spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner of a parent or grandparent of
the employee, or a sibling of a spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner
of the employee, or any other individual related by blood to the employee or
whose close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family
relationship.
(8) Paid sick time or paid sick days. – Time that is (i) compensated at the same
hourly rate and with the same benefits, including health care benefits, as the
employee normally earns during hours worked and (ii) provided by an
employer to an employee for the purposes described in G.S. 95-31.4(b).
(9) Parent. – A biological, foster, step, or adoptive parent of an employee or an
employee's spouse, or other person who stood in loco parentis during the
childhood of an employee or employee's spouse.
(10) Sexual assault. – As defined in Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.
Page 2 Senate Bill 635-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) Small business. – An employer who employs 10 or fewer employees during
20 or more calendar workweeks in the current or preceding calendar year.
(12) Stalking. – As defined in Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.
"§ 95-31.3. Exemptions.
(a) The provisions of this Article do not apply to any bona fide volunteers in any
organization where an employer-employee relationship does not exist.
(b) The provisions of this Article do not apply to any person exempted from the Wage
and Hour Act under G.S. 95-25.14(a)(2) through (8), 95-25.14(b), 95-25.14(b1), 95-25.14(c),
and 95-25.14(e), except that domestic workers are exempted only if they are employed in the
place of residence of their employer.
"§ 95-31.4. Accrual of paid sick time.
(a) Except as provided by G.S. 95-31.3, any employee who works in this State and who
must be absent from work for the reasons set forth in G.S. 95-31.5(a) shall be entitled to paid
sick time.
(b) Paid sick time as provided in this section shall begin to accrue at the commencement
of employment. Paid sick time shall accrue at the rate of one hour of pay for every 30 hours
worked. Paid sick time may be used as accrued or be loaned by the employer at its discretion to
the employee in advance of accrual. Unless the employer and employee agree to designate
otherwise, for periods of paid sick time that are less than a normal workday, the time shall be
counted on an hourly basis or the smallest increment that the employer's payroll system uses to
account for absences or use of leave.
(c) For employees of small businesses, there shall be a limit of 32 hours of accrued paid
sick time in a calendar year. For employees of other employers, there shall be a limit of 56 hours
of accrued paid sick time in a calendar year. Accrued paid sick time for employees carries over
from year to year but is limited to the aforementioned limits.
(d) When there is separation from employment and the employee is rehired within 90
days of separation by the same employer, previously accrued paid sick time that had not been
used shall be reinstated. The employee shall be entitled to use accrued paid sick time and accrue
additional sick time at the recommencement of employment.
"§ 95-31.5. Use of paid sick time.
(a) Paid sick time shall be provided to an employee by an employer for any of the
following reasons:
(1) To care for the employee's immediate family member who is suffering from a
physical or mental illness, injury, or medical condition that requires care,
professional medical diagnosis or care, preventive medical care, or a routine
medical appointment.
(2) To care for the employee's own physical or mental illness, injury, or medical
condition that requires care, professional medical diagnosis or care, preventive
medical care, or a routine medical appointment.
(3) Absence necessary due to circumstances resulting from the employee, or a
family member of the employee, being a victim of stalking or domestic or
sexual violence, if the leave is to allow the employee to obtain for the
employee or the family member (i) medical attention needed to recover from
physical or psychological injury or disability caused by stalking or domestic
or sexual violence, (ii) services from a designated domestic violence agency
or other victim services organization, (iii) psychological or other counseling,
(iv) relocation, or (v) legal services, including obtaining a restraining order or
preparing for, or participating in, any civil or criminal legal proceeding related
to the stalking or domestic or sexual violence.
(b) An employer may require certification of the qualifying illness, injury, health
condition, or violence when a paid sick time period covers more than three consecutive workdays.
Senate Bill 635-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Any reasonable documentation signed by a health care provider involved in following or treating
the illness, injury, or health condition and indicating the need for the number of sick days taken
shall be deemed acceptable certification. Acceptable certification of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking may include (i) law enforcement, court, or federal agency records or files, (ii)
documentation from a domestic violence or sexual assault program, or (iii) documentation from
a religious, medical, or other professional from whom assistance was sought in dealing with the
alleged domestic violence, sexual offense, or stalking.
(1) The employer shall not require certification from a health care provider
employed by the employer. The employer shall not delay the commencement
of time taken for purposes of subsection (a) of this section or pay for this
period on the basis that the employer has not yet received the certification.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an employee to provide
as certification any information from a health care provider that would be in
violation of section 1177 of the Social Security Act or the regulations
promulgated pursuant to section 264(c) of the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d-2.
(2) An employer may not require disclosure of details relating to domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking or the details of an employee's medical
condition as a condition of providing paid sick time under this Article. If an
employer possesses health information or information pertaining to domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking about an employee or employee's
immediate family member, such information shall be treated as confidential
and not disclosed except to the affected employee or with the permission of
the affected employee.
(c) When the use of paid sick time is foreseeable, the employee shall make a good-faith
effort to provide notice of the need for such time to the employer in advance of the use of the
sick time and shall make a reasonable effort to schedule the use of paid sick time in a manner
that does not unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.
(d) An employer may not require, as a condition of providing paid sick time under this
act, that the employee search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours during which
the employee is on paid sick time.
(e) An employer's absence control policy shall not count paid sick time taken under this
Article as an absence that may lead to or result in a retaliatory personnel action or any other
adverse action.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring financial or other
reimbursement to an employee from an employer upon the employee's termination, resignation,
retirement, or other separation from employment for accrued paid sick days that have not been
used.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to discourage employers from adopting or
retaining paid sick time policies more generous than policies that comply with the requirements
of this section, and nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of an
employer to comply with any contract, collective bargaining agreement, or any employment
benefit program or plan that provides greater paid sick time leave rights to employees than the
rights established under this section.
(h) This act provides minimum requirements pertaining to paid sick time and shall not be
construed to preempt, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law, regulation,
requirement, policy, agreement, or standard that provides for greater accrual or use by employees
of sick time, whether paid or unpaid, or that extends other protections to employees.
(i) Employers who have a paid time-off leave policy shall not be required to modify that
policy, if that policy offers an employee the option, at the employee's discretion, to take paid sick
Page 4 Senate Bill 635-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
time that is at least equivalent to the amounts and for the same purposes and under the same
conditions as provided under this section.
"§ 95-31.6. Notification, posting, and records.
Employers shall give notice (i) that employees are entitled to paid sick time, (ii) of the amount
of paid sick time and the terms of its use guaranteed under this section, (iii) that retaliation against
employees who request or use paid sick time is prohibited, and (iv) that each employee has the
right to file a complaint with the Commissioner of Labor or in the General Court of Justice if
paid sick time as required by this Article is denied by the employer or the employee is retaliated
against for requesting or taking paid sick time. Employers may comply with this section by
supplying each of their employees with a notice in English and in Spanish that contains the
information required by this section or by displaying a poster in a conspicuous and accessible
place in each establishment where the employees are employed that contains in English and in
Spanish all information required by this section.
"§ 95-31.7. Enforcement.
(a) The Commissioner shall enforce and administer the provisions of this Article, and the
Commissioner or his or her authorized representative is empowered to hold hearings and to
institute civil proceedings hereunder.
(b) The Commissioner or the Commissioner's authorized representative shall have power
to administer oaths and examine witnesses, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses
and the production of papers, books, accounts, records, payrolls, and documents, and take
depositions and affidavits in any proceeding hereunder.
(c) Any employer who violates the provisions of this Article shall be liable to the
employee or employees affected in the amount of their unpaid sick time as the case may be, plus
interest at the legal rate set forth in G.S. 24-1 from the date each amount first came due.
(d) In addition to the amounts awarded pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the court
shall award liquidated damages in an amount equal to the amount found to be due as provided in
subsection (c) of this section, provided that if the employer shows to the satisfaction of the court
that the act or omission constituting the violation was in good faith and that the employer had
reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not a violation of this Article, the
court may, in its discretion, award no liquidated damages or may award any amount of liquidated
damages not exceeding the amount found due as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Action to recover such liability may be maintained in the General Court of Justice by
any one or more employees.
(f) The court, in any action brought under this Article, may, in addition to any judgment
awarded to the plaintiff, order costs and fees of the action and reasonable attorneys' fees to be
paid by the defendant. The court may order costs and fees of the action and reasonable attorneys'
fees to be paid by the plaintiff if the court determines that the action was frivolous.
(g) The Commissioner may determine and supervise the payment of the amounts due
under this section, including interest at the legal rate set forth in G.S. 24-1 from the date each
amount first came due, and the agreement to accept such amounts by the employee shall
constitute a waiver of the employee's right to bring an action under subsection (e) of this section.
(h) Actions under this Article must be brought within two years pursuant to G.S. 1-53.
(i) The rights and remedies created by this Article are supplementary to all existing
common-law and statutory rights and remedies.
"§ 95-31.8. Rules.
The Commissioner of Labor shall adopt rules to implement this Article.
"§ 95-31.9. Severability.
The provisions of this Article shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or
provision is declared to be invalid or is preempted by federal law or regulation, the validity of
the remainder of this Article shall not be affected thereby."
SECTION 2. G.S. 95-241(a) reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 635-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(a) No person shall discriminate or take any retaliatory action against an employee
because the employee in good faith does or threatens to do any of the following:
(1) File a claim or complaint, initiate any inquiry, investigation, inspection,
proceeding or other action, or testify or provide information to any person
with respect to any of the following:
a. Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.
b. Article 2A Article 2A, Article 3A, or Article 16 of this Chapter.
c. Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes.
d. G.S. 95-28.1.
e. Article 16 of Chapter 127A of the General Statutes.
f. G.S. 95-28.1A.
g. Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
h. Article 5F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(2) Cause any of the activities listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection to be
initiated on an employee's behalf.
(3) Exercise any right on behalf of the employee or any other employee afforded
by Article 2A Article 2A, Article 3A, or Article 16 of this Chapter, by Article
2A of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes, or by Article 52 of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes.
(4) Comply with the provisions of Article 27 of Chapter 7B of the General
Statutes.
(5) Exercise rights under Chapter 50B. Actions brought under this subdivision
shall be in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 50B-5.5."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies only to
covered employment on or after that date. With respect to employees covered by a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect on January 1, 2026, this act shall not apply until the
stated expiration date in the collective bargaining agreement; however, this act shall apply upon
any such agreement's renewal, extension, amendment, or modification in any respect after
January 1, 2026.
Page 6 Senate Bill 635-First Edition